Utah statutes.
16-10a-602.   Terms of class or series determined by board of directors.
(1)  If the articles of incorporation so provide, the board of directors,
without shareholder action but subject to any limitations and restrictions
stated in the articles of incorporation, may amend the corporation's articles
of incorporation pursuant to the authority granted to the board of directors
by Subsection 16-10a-1002(1)(e) to do any of the following:
(a)  designate in whole or in part, the preferences, limitations, and relative
rights, within the limits set forth in Section 16-10a-601, of any class of
shares before the issuance of any shares of that class;
(b)  create one or more series within a class of shares, fix the number of
shares of each such series, and designate, in whole or part, the preferences,
limitations, and relative rights of the series, within the limits set forth in
Section 16-10a-601, all before the issuance of any shares of that series;
(c)  alter or revoke the preferences, limitations, and relative rights granted
to or imposed upon any wholly unissued class of shares or any wholly unissued
series of any class of shares; or
(d)  increase or decrease the number of shares constituting any series, the
number of shares of which was originally fixed by the board of directors,
either before or after the issuance of shares of the series, provided that the
number may not be decreased below the number of shares of the series then
outstanding, or increased above the total number of authorized shares of the
applicable class of shares available for designation as a part of the series.
(2)  Each series of a class shall be given a distinguishing designation.
(3)  All shares of a series shall have preferences, limitations, and relative
rights identical with those of other shares of the same series and, except to
the extent otherwise provided in the description of the series, with those of
other series of the same class.
(4)  Before issuing any shares of a class or series created under this
section, or having preferences, limitations, or relative rights designated by
the board of directors as provided in this section, and before any amendment
to articles of incorporation contemplated by Subsection (1) shall be
effective, the corporation shall deliver to the division for filing, in
accordance with the procedure set forth in Section 16-10a-1006, articles of
amendment that set forth:
(a)  the name of the corporation;
(b)  the text of the amendment adopted by the board of directors pursuant to
Subsection (1);
(c)  the date the amendment was adopted by the board of directors;
(d)  a statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors
without shareholder action and that shareholder action was not required; and
(e)  if the amendment alters or revokes the preferences, limitations, or
relative rights granted to or imposed upon any wholly unissued class of shares
or any wholly unissued series of any class of shares, a statement that none of
the shares of any class or series of shares so affected has been issued.
